Washington statutes.
RCW 9.73.220

Judicial authorizations—Availability of judge required.

In each superior court judicial district in a county with a population of two hundred ten thousand or more there shall be available twenty-four hours a day at least one superior court or district court judge or magistrate designated to receive telephonic requests for authorizations that may be issued pursuant to this chapter. The presiding judge of each such superior court in conjunction with the district court judges in that superior court judicial district shall establish a coordinated schedule of rotation for all of the superior and district court judges and magistrates in the superior court judicial district for purposes of ensuring the availability of at least one judge or magistrate at all times. During the period that each judge or magistrate is designated, he or she shall be equipped with an electronic paging device when not present at his or her usual telephone. It shall be the designated judge's or magistrate's responsibility to ensure that all attempts to reach him or her for purposes of requesting authorization pursuant to this chapter are forwarded to the electronic page number when the judge or magistrate leaves the place where he or she would normally receive such calls.

[ 1991 c 363 s 9; 1989 c 271 s 203.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.